Utah statutes.
78B-5-320.   Grounds for nonrecognition of libel judgments.

A judgment obtained in a foreign jurisdiction may be considered nonrecognizable and unenforceable by the courts of this state if:

(1)  the judgment was obtained in a jurisdiction outside the United States;

(2)  the judgment resulted in a libel judgment for damages; and

(3)  the court sitting in this state before which the matter is brought determines that the libel law applied in the foreign court's adjudication process did not provide at least as much protection for freedom of speech and press as would be provided by the United States Constitution and the Utah Constitution.

